Missouri, session 2026, SB1125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 59, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 59.306, to read as
follows:
59.306. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Real Property Fraud Prevention Act".
2. The recorder of deeds of each county of this state
shall provide notice as required under this section to each
property owner or owner of record of a parcel of real
property, as determined by the most recent real property tax
records, that a general warranty deed or quitclaim deed that
affects the ownership of such parcel of real property has
been submitted for recording.
3. The recorder of deeds shall:
(1) Delay the recording of a deed described under
subsection 2 of this section for at least five working days
from the date of such deed's receipt to provide time for the
recorder of deeds to notify each property owner or owner of
record of such parcel of real property that such deed has
been submitted for recording;

SB 1125 2
(2) Notify each property owner or owner of record of
such parcel of real property by telephone, text message,
facsimile, or email, if such information is known; and
(3) Send such notification by first class mail to the
address of record of each property owner or owner of record
of such parcel of real property informing such owner that a
deed that affects such owner's ownership interest in the
real property described by such deed has been submitted for
recording.
4. (1) If each property owner or owner of record of
such parcel of real property provides written confirmation
that the deed presented for recording is legitimate, the
delay required under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this
section shall no longer apply and the recorder of deeds may
immediately proceed with the recording of the deed.
(2) If, prior to the expiration of the delay required
under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section, the
recorder of deeds is notified by each property owner or
owner of record of such parcel of real property that such
deed is fraudulent, the recorder of deeds shall delay the
recording of the deed for at least an additional two
business days to provide time for each property owner or
owner of record of such parcel of real property to seek an
order from a court of competent jurisdiction to prohibit the
recording of the apparently fraudulent deed.
5. The recorder of deeds shall not delay the recording
of a general warranty deed or quitclaim deed as required
under this section if at least one of the following
conditions has been met:
(1) The general warranty deed or quitclaim deed
presented for recording was submitted by a real estate

SB 1125 3
broker who holds a valid Missouri real estate broker license
under chapter 339; or
(2) The general warranty deed or quitclaim deed
presented for recording was reviewed by a title company that
is duly licensed under chapter 381 and such title company
has issued title insurance to guaranty the validity of the
deed for the prospective owner or owners of such parcel of
real property.
6. (1) As used in this subsection, "defective deed"
means a deed that:
(a) Fails to provide adequate grantee or grantor
information;
(b) Fails to provide a proper description of the
parcel of real property being transferred;
(c) Lacks the signature of a grantor;
(d) Does not have a proper notary acknowledgment and
seal under sections 486.730 and 486.760; or
(e) Is notarized by a notary whose commission has
expired prior to notarizing the deed.
(2) The recorder of deeds of each county of this state
is hereby authorized to reject and return a general warranty
deed or quitclaim deed that has been deemed by the recorder
of deeds to be a defective deed.
✓